Utah statutes.
53A-11-1101.   Notification of teachers of weapons on school property -- Immunity from civil and criminal liability.

(1)  Whenever a student is found on school property during school hours or at a school-sponsored activity in possession of a dangerous weapon and that information is reported to or known by the principal, the principal shall notify law enforcement personnel and school or district personnel who, in the opinion of the principal, should be informed.

(2)  A person who in good faith reports information under Subsection (1) and any person who receives the information is immune from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise result from the reporting or receipt of the information.



Enacted by Chapter 256, 1994 General Session

